Washington statutes.
RCW 19.84.040

Criminal penalty.

Any person, firm or corporation who shall violate any of the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars for each offense.

[ 1907 c 253 s 4; RRS s 5840.]